Hawaii statutes.
§655-2 Enforcement of order. Whenever
in the exercise of its authority a court has ordered the deposit or delivery of
money or other thing, and the order is disobeyed, the court, besides punishing
the disobedience, may make an order requiring the sheriff, or any of the
sheriff's deputies, or any police officer to take the money or thing and
deposit or deliver it in conformity with the direction of the court. [CC 1859,
§1154; am imp L 1905, c 39, §67; am imp L 1907, c 118, §122; RL 1925, §2384; RL
1935, §4118; am L 1939, c 104, §7; am L 1943, c 62, §21 and c 64, §22; RL 1945,
§10232; RL 1955, §243-2; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §655-2; gen ch 1985; am L
1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rules 64, 70.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next